Arkansas, session 2025, SB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 76, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-76-120. Waiver to enhance nutrition in the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program.
The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall request a
waiver from the United States Department of Agriculture to exclude candy and
soft drinks from the definition of eligible foods under 7 C.F.R. § 271.2, as
it existed on January 1, 2025.
(1) If a waiver requested under this section is granted, the
secretary shall prohibit the purchase of candy and soft drinks with benefits
provided through the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(2) If the waiver requested under this section is not granted,
*CRH046*
04-07-2025 16:41:49 CRH046

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB217
the secretary shall request a waiver annually until the waiver to exclude
candy and soft drinks from the definition of eligible foods is granted.

/s/C. Penzo
































04-07-2025 16:41:49 CRH046